Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 7.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-1107
Adoption of joint merger plan.

After a public hearing held pursuant to section 16-1106, the city council of each city shall adopt the joint merger plan by a majority vote of the council.

Laws 2008, LB1056, § 7.